Illinois, session 104th, HB1278.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Victims' Economic Security and Safety Act 5is amended by adding Section 33 as follows: 6    (820 ILCS 180/33 new)7    Sec. 33. Employees' personal use of employer-provided 8electronic devices.9    (a) An employer shall not fail to hire, refuse to hire, 10discharge, constructively discharge, harass, discriminate with 11respect to compensation, terms, conditions, or privileges of 12employment, or retaliate against an employee in any form or 13manner because the employee used employer-issued equipment to 14record domestic violence, sexual violence, gender violence, or 15any other crime of violence committed against the employee or 16a family or household member of the employee.17    (b) An employer shall not deprive an employee of 18employer-issued equipment solely because the employee used or 19attempted to use the employer-issued equipment to record 20domestic violence, sexual violence, gender violence, or any 21other crime of violence committed against the employee or a 22family or household member of the employee.23    (c) An employer shall grant an employee access to any   HB1278 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 03137 SPS 13158 b1photographs, voice or video recordings, sound recordings, or 2any other digital documents or communications stored on an 3employer-issued device relating to domestic violence, sexual 4violence, gender violence, or any other crime of violence 5committed against the employee or a family or household member 6of the employee.7    (d) Nothing in this Section prohibits an employer from 8complying with an investigation, court order, or subpoena for 9a device, information, data, or documents.10    (e) Nothing in this Section shall be construed to relieve 11an employee of obligations to comply with an employer's 12reasonable employment policies or to perform the essential 13functions of employment.